Tennessee, session 114, HB2605.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 29, Chapter 34, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) A person who suffers injury, death, or property damage caused by the
negligent action of an agent of the federal government while the agent is engaged in an
immigration enforcement action may file a suit against the federal agency that employs
the agent to recover:
(1) Compensatory damages; and
(2) Reasonable attorney's fees and costs of bringing the action.
(b) A person must file a claim under subsection (a) within one (1) year of the
cause of action accruing.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2605
012776
- 1 -